Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Supplement, 202581-15,127
Notice of registration requirements; duty to provide.

(1) Any person who deposits regulated substances in a tank shall reasonably notify the owner or operator of such tank of the owner's or operator's registration requirements pursuant to the Petroleum Products and Hazardous Substances Storage and Handling Act.

(2) The Department of Water, Energy, and Environment shall design and make available a printed notice of registration for owners of tanks to any person who deposits regulated substances in a tank.

Laws 1986, LB 217, § 11;

Laws 1993, LB 3, § 65;

Laws 2019, LB302, § 126;

Laws 2025, LB317, § 416.